Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-803] Winding up.
(a) A limited partnership continues after dissolution only for the purpose of
winding up its activities.

(b) In winding up its activities, the limited
partnership:

(1) May amend its certificate of limited partnership
to state that the limited partnership is dissolved, preserve the limited
partnership business or property as a going concern for a reasonable time,
prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or
administrative, transfer the limited partnership's property, settle disputes by
mediation or arbitration, file a statement of termination as provided in
section 425E-203, and perform other necessary acts; and

(2) Shall discharge the limited partnership's
liabilities, settle and close the limited partnership's activities, and marshal
and distribute the assets of the partnership.

(c) If a dissolved limited partnership does
not have a general partner, a person to wind up the dissolved limited
partnership's activities may be appointed by the consent of limited partners
owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at
the time the consent is to be effective. A person appointed under this
subsection:

(1) Has the powers of a general partner under section
425E-804; and

(2) Shall promptly amend the certificate of limited
partnership to state:

(A) That the limited partnership does not have
a general partner;

(B) The name of the person that has been
appointed to wind up the limited partnership; and

(C) The street and mailing address of the
person.

(d) On the application of any partner, the
circuit court may order judicial supervision of the winding up, including the
appointment of a person to wind up the dissolved limited partnership's
activities, if:

(1) A limited partnership does not have a general
partner and within a reasonable time following the dissolution no person has
been appointed pursuant to subsection (c); or

(2) The applicant establishes other good cause. [L
2003, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next